Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1088.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Coverage for Blood Pressure Monitors.--(a) A health insurance policy that is offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth shall provide coverage, including reimbursement, for medically necessary blood pressure monitors for pregnant or postpartum insureds for each pregnancy.12345678910111213141516171819202122 (b) As used in this section:"Health insurance policy" means a policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by a health insurer that provides medical or health care coverage. The term does not include any of the following:(1) An accident only policy.(2) A credit only policy.(3) A long-term care or disability income policy.(4) A specified disease policy.(5) A Medicare supplement policy.(6) A fixed indemnity policy.(7) A hospital indemnity policy.(8) A dental only policy.(9) A vision only policy.(10) A workers' compensation policy.(11) An automobile medical payment policy.(12) A policy under which benefits are provided by the Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents.(13) Any other similar policy providing for limited benefits."Insurer" means an entity licensed by the department that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(1) This act, including section 630 and Article XXIV.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).20250HB1088PN1205 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Postpartum" means within one year of delivery or the end of pregnancy.Section 2. The following shall apply:(1) For a health insurance policy for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, section 635.11 of the act shall apply to a policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For a health insurance policy for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, section 635.11 of the act shall apply to a policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1088PN1205 - 3 - 1234567891011121314